North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 14. Dental Health.

§ 130A-366.
Department to establish dental health program.

The Department shall establish and administer a dental health program for the delivery of preventive, educational and dental care services to preschool children, school-age children, and adults. The program shall include, but not be limited to, providing
teacher training, adult and child education, consultation, screening and referral, technical assistance, community coordination, field research and direct patient care. The primary emphasis of the program shall be the delivery
of preventive, educational, and dental care services to preschool children and school-age children.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 269.

§ 130A-367.
Dental providers for problem access areas.

The State’s dental public health program shall encourage the expansion of current educational and training programs for dentists, dental hygienists, and dental assistants targeted to serve citizens’ unmet needs, particularly in the rural and low-income
areas that have traditionally had problems in accessing dental care. The program shall also promote and encourage the recruitment of in-State and out-of-state private sector dental personnel to work in these dental health professional
shortage areas.

History.
2002-37, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to issuance of limited volunteer dental license to practice dentistry in nonprofit health care facilities serving low-income populations, see

G.S. 90-37.1

.

§§ 130A-368 through 130A-370.

Reserved for future codification purposes.